Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF2224.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 7 SF 2224 (2) 91 jda/jh/mb S.F. 2224 Section 1. Section 256.7, subsection 26, paragraph a, 1 subparagraph (4), Code 2026, is amended to read as follows: 2 (4) The rules shall provide for the establishment of 3 high-quality standards for computer science education taught 4 by elementary, middle, and high schools, in accordance with 5 the goal established under section 284.6A, subsection 1 , 6 setting a foundation for personal and professional success 7 in a high-technology, knowledge-based Iowa economy. The 8 high-quality standards for computer science education must 9 require that all levels and grades of computer science 10 instruction include instruction related to the fundamental 11 concepts of evolving computer science technologies and 12 artificial intelligence, including instruction that explains 13 what artificial intelligence is, how artificial intelligence 14 works, and the societal and ethical impacts of artificial 15 intelligence. 16 Sec. 2. Section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph l, Code 17 2026, is amended to read as follows: 18 l. (1) One-half unit of computer science commencing with 19 the school year beginning July 1, 2022 . 20 (2) The one-half unit of computer science shall incorporate 21 the standards established pursuant to section 256.7, subsection 22 26 , paragraph âaâ , subparagraph (4), and may be offered online 23 in accordance with rules adopted pursuant to section 256.7, 24 subsection 32 , paragraph âaâ . 25 (3) The one-half unit of computer science may include 26 instruction related to applied sciences, technology, 27 engineering, or manufacturing, including transportation, 28 distribution, logistics, architecture, and construction, which 29 may be offered and taught through dedicated units of coursework 30 or through units of coursework that also meet the requirements 31 of the coursework required under paragraph âhâ , subparagraph 32 (1), subparagraph division (c). The state board shall adopt 33 rules pursuant to chapter 17A to implement this subparagraph. 34 Sec. 3. Section 256.16, subsection 1, Code 2026, is amended 35 -1- SF 2224 (2) 91 jda/jh/mb 1/ 2 S.F. 2224 by adding the following new paragraph: 1 NEW PARAGRAPH . p. Include preparation in computer science, 2 artificial intelligence, and computational thinking that is 3 appropriate to the grade level and subject area in which 4 the student who is enrolled in the practitioner preparation 5 program will teach. A higher education institution providing 6 practitioner preparation may satisfy this requirement by 7 requiring a student who is enrolled in the practitioner 8 preparation program to complete a dedicated course or 9 module, or by integrating such preparation into the existing 10 practitioner preparation program. 11 Sec. 4. Section 256E.7, subsection 2, paragraph h, Code 12 2026, is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 13 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (4) The educational standards 14 established in section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ , 15 related to the use of instruction related to applied sciences, 16 technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion 17 of the unit requirements related to computer science. 18 Sec. 5. Section 256F.4, subsection 2, Code 2026, is amended 19 by adding the following new paragraph: 20 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0s. Be subject to and comply with the 21 requirements of section 256.11, subsection 5, paragraph âlâ , 22 relating to the use of instruction related to applied sciences, 23 technology, engineering, or manufacturing to fulfill a portion 24 of the unit requirements related to computer science in the 25 same manner as a school district. 26 Sec. 6. APPLICABILITY. The following applies to students 27 admitted to an approved practitioner preparation program on or 28 after July 1, 2028: 29 The section of this Act amending section 256.16. 30 -2- SF 2224 (2) 91 jda/jh/mb 2/ 2